Maryland, session 2026, HB0303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
5–306.
(A–3) (1) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, AND EACH OCTOBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL PUBLISH A
HANDBOOK SUMMARIZING ALL STATE LAWS, FEDERAL LAWS, AND CASE LAW THAT
ARE APPLICABLE TO THE WEARING, CARRYING, AND TRANSPORTING OF A HANDGUN
IN PUBLIC IN THE STATE.
(2) THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL DRAFT THE
HANDBOOK:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0303*

HOUSE BILL 303
(I) IN PLAIN LANGUAGE THAT CAN BE EASILY UNDERSTOOD
WITHOUT ANY SPECIAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE APPLICABLE STATE LAWS, FEDERAL
LAWS, OR CASE LAW; AND
(II) IN A FORMAT THAT CAN BE EASILY USED TO TEACH A
FIREARM SAFETY COURSE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.